Maryland, session 2025, HB0378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–1805.
(a) The Department shall:
(1) Define different levels of assisted living according to the level of care
provided;
(2) Require all assisted living programs to be licensed to operate according
to the level of the program;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0378*

HOUSE BILL 378
(3) Develop a waiver process for authorizing an assisted living program to
continue to care for an individual whose medical or functional condition has changed since
admission to the program to an extent that the level of care required by the individual
exceeds the level of care for which the program is licensed;
(4) Promote affordable and accessible assisted living programs throughout
the State;
(5) Establish and enforce quality standards for assisted living programs;
(6) Require periodic inspections of assisted living program facilities,
including at least an annual unannounced on–site inspection;
(7) Establish requirements for the qualifications or training or both of
assisted living program employees;
(8) Establish a “resident bill of rights” for residents of assisted living
program facilities that includes, at a minimum:
(i) The right to be treated with consideration, respect, and full
recognition of human dignity and individuality;
(ii) The right to receive treatment, care, and services that are
adequate, appropriate, and in compliance with relevant federal and State laws, rules, and
regulations;
(iii) The right to be free from mental and physical abuse;
(iv) The right to be free from mental, verbal, sexual, and physical
abuse, neglect, or involuntary seclusion or exploitation;
(v) The right to notice, procedural fairness, and humane treatment
when being transferred or discharged from a facility;
(vi) The right to participate in decision making regarding transitions
in care, including a transfer or discharge from a facility;
(vii) The right to be free from physical and chemical restraints, except
for restraints that a physician authorizes for a clearly indicated medical need; and
(viii) The right to manage personal financial affairs;
(9) Define which, if any, assisted living programs may be exempt from the
requirements of § 19–311 of this title; and
(10) For Alzheimer’s special care units:

HOUSE BILL 378 3
(i) Establish the number of dementia–specific training hours to be
completed for those staff working in Alzheimer’s special care units;
(ii) Determine the topic content for dementia–specific training
required for those staff working in Alzheimer’s special care units; and
(iii) Require staff sufficient to meet the needs of residents in
Alzheimer’s special care units.
(B) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY WITH RESPECT TO AN ASSISTED
LIVING PROGRAM LOCATED IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) CONDUCT AN INSPECTION OF EACH ASSISTED LIVING
PROGRAM AT LEAST ONCE EVERY 60 DAYS; AND
(II) 1. PUBLISH A REPORT OF EACH INSPECTION
CONDUCTED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE
WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE DATE ON WHICH THE INSPECTION WAS COMPLETED;
AND
2. PROVIDE THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER ITEM 1 OF
THIS ITEM TO THE PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY COUNCIL.
[(b)] (C) (1) The Department, in consultation with representatives of the
affected industry and advocates for residents of the facilities and with the approval of the
Department of Aging and the Department of Human Services, shall adopt regulations to
implement this subtitle.
(2) The regulations adopted under paragraph (1) of this subsection shall:
(i) Provide for the licensing of assisted living programs;
(ii) Require the Department, during a survey or other inspection of
an assisted living program, to review the number of waivers granted to the program under
subsection (a)(3) of this section and determine whether a change in the program’s licensure
status is warranted; and
(iii) Require an assisted living program facility to post in a
conspicuous place visible to actual and potential residents of the facility and other
interested parties:
1. A. Its statement of deficiencies for the most recent
survey;

HOUSE BILL 378
B. Any subsequent complaint investigations conducted by
federal, State, or local surveyors; and
C. Any plans of correction in effect with respect to the survey
or complaint investigation; or
2. A notice of the location, within the facility, of the items
listed in item 1 of this item.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.